Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-932
Act, how cited.

Sections 42-932 to 42-940 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 90.